incubator/apertium-fin-udm/apertium-fin-udm.fin.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>   ! Имя существительное · Noun

LEXICON Root

Nouns ; 

LEXICON K
# ;

LEXICON PX
K ;


LEXICON PXTRA
:i #;
:e PX :

LEXICON SGCASE

%<nom%>: PX ; ! Именительный 
%<gen%>:%>n PX ; ! Родительный
%<acc%>:%>n PX ; ! Винительный
%<par%>:%>t%{A%} PX ; ! 
%<ill%>:%>%{V%}n PX ; ! 

LEXICON PLCASE

%<nom%>:t PX ; ! Именительный 
%<gen%>:%>jen PX ; ! Родительный
%<acc%>:%>t PX ; ! Винительный
%<par%>:%>it%{A%} PX ; ! 
%<ill%>:%>ihiin PX ; ! 
%<com%>:%>ine PX ; ! 

LEXICON COMMONCASE
%<ine%>:%>ss%{A%} PX ; ! 
%<ela%>:%>st%{A%} PX ; ! 
%<all%>:%>lle PX ; ! 
%<ade%>:%>ll%{A%} PX ; ! 
%<abl%>:%>lt%{A%} PX ; ! 
%<ess%>:%>n%{A%} PX ; ! 
%<tra%>:%>ks% PXTRA ; ! 
%<abe%>:%>tt%{A%} PX ; ! 

LEXICON N1

%<n%>%<sg%>: SGCASE ;
%<n%>%<pl%>: PLCASE ;
%<n%>%<sg%>: COMMONCASE ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>i COMMONCASE ;



LEXICON Nouns

koira N1 ; ! ""
puutarha N1 ; ! ""
sää N1 ; ! ""
ulko N1 ; ! ""
talo N1 ; ! ""
poika N1 ; ! ""
tyttö N1 ; ! ""
lapsi N1 ; ! ""
kissa N1 ; ! ""
äiti N1 ; ! ""
ikkuna N1 ; ! ""
puu N1 ; ! ""
silmä N1 ; ! ""
käsi N1 ; ! ""
leikki N1 ; ! ""
kysymys N1 ; ! ""
vastaus N1 ; ! ""
pöytä N1 ; ! ""
tuoli N1 ; ! ""
ääni N1 ; ! ""
lintu N1 ; ! ""
eläin N1 ; ! ""
pää N1 ; ! ""
vesi N1 ; ! ""
